Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 9 Payment of Expenses for Support, Treatment,
and Care of Patients in State
Institutions Generally

Cross references.

Payment of costs of hospital care for the indigent, § 31-8-1 et seq.

Medical assistance generally, §

49-4-140

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency receiving, evaluating and treatment facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-1.

Pretrial examination and for commitment because of incompetency to stand trial, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-3.

37-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Patient Cost of Care Act.”

History.
Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note examining constitutional implications of this chapter, with a comparison of similar statutes and their treatment in other jurisdictions, see 12 Mercer L. Rev. 355 (1961).

For note, “The Parity Cure: Solving Unequal Treatment of Mental Illness Health Insurance Through Federal Legislation,” see 44 Ga. L. Rev. 511 (2010).

37-9-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Assessment” means a determination by the department of the amount payable by the persons liable for cost of care for services rendered to a patient; such amount shall be either the full cost of care or, if applicable, the amount payable toward cost of
care, determined in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 37-9-5. It is expressly provided that there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the full cost of care is to be imposed. This presumption shall prevail until
testimony, documentation, or evidence is provided pursuant to other provisions of this chapter.

“Cost of care” means the costs incurred for the support, care, and treatment of each individual patient or the per patient average of such costs as determined by the department on the basis of the estimated current operating costs of the hospital or an
identifiable part or section thereof providing such services.

“Income,” except for patients who are residents of other states, means that amount determined by adding to the gross income as now or hereafter defined in Georgia income tax laws, minus deductions and personal exemptions as authorized by such income tax
laws, the items listed in this paragraph, if such items are not already included in gross income as defined above. For a patient who is a resident of another state, “income” means the same as above except no deductions will be
made for any deductions or personal exemptions as authorized by Georgia income tax laws. The following items are to be added, respectively:

Any amounts received by or on behalf of the person liable for cost of care from accident insurance or workers’ compensation for total or partial incapacity to work, plus the amount of any damages received by or on behalf of the person liable for cost
of care, whether by suit or agreement, on account of such injuries or sickness;

The net income from property acquired by gift, bequest, devise, or descent;

Interest upon obligations of the United States government or of this state or of a political subdivision thereof;

The net income from individual holdings of stock in banks and trust companies incorporated under the banking laws of this state or of the United States;

Retirement income, social security benefits, veterans’ benefits, and any other benefits that could be applied for the support of the patient;

The net income from any other assets, including but not limited to personal property, real property, or mixed property, and any other property or estate wherever located and in whatever form, inclusive of any assets sold or transferred within a period
of 90 days prior to the date services were first rendered to the patient by a hospital.

“Patient” means any person who is admitted to or who receives services from a state hospital.

“Persons liable for cost of care” means:

The patient or his estate;

The patient’s spouse;

The parent or parents of any patient under 18 years of age;

Any fiduciary or representative payee holding assets for the patient or on his behalf, including, in his representative capacity, the guardian, trustee, executor, or administrator of any trust, estate, inheritance, or fund in which a patient has a legal
or beneficial interest;

Any person, if not otherwise liable, listed as the insured member of a contract, plan, or benefit to the extent that such contract, plan, or benefit provides payment of hospitalization, medical expenses, and other health care services for the patient
as a covered beneficiary or dependent;

A stepparent or any other person residing with and providing support of a patient under 18 years of age who has not been legally adopted by such individual, with maximum liability limited to the amount such stepparent or other individual is authorized
by Georgia income tax laws to claim as a standard deduction and personal exemption for the patient; provided, however, that this limitation shall not apply to liability pursuant to other provisions of this chapter regarding
hospital, health, and other medical insurance, program, or plan benefits or subrogation rights.

“State hospital” means any state hospital which now or hereafter comes under the control of the department and any facility operated in conjunction therewith.

History.
Ga. L. 1960, p. 1138, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 143, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 37; Ga. L. 1985, p. 987, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 37; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1445, § 1; Ga. L. 2002,
p. 1324, § 1-17; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-20/HB 228.

37-9-3.
Payment for cost of care as not affecting nature or quality of care.

Care rendered to all patients in state hospitals shall be of the same nature and quality without regard to whether the payment of any sum or sums is made under this chapter for the cost of care.

History.
Ga. L. 1960, p. 1138, § 11; Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 11.

Law reviews.

For note, “Payment of Cost for Care of Patients in State Institutions Act — A New Approach in Georgia,” see 12 Mercer L. Rev. 343 (1961).

37-9-4.
Liability of patient for cost of care; time of payment; inability of department to collect assessment from patient or failure of patient’s assessment to cover cost of care.

Each patient receiving services from a state hospital shall be legally responsible for, and shall pay to the department, the cost of his care received from a state hospital. Payments for cost of care shall be payable following the receipt of services
in accordance with standards and procedures established by the board. In the event the department is unable to collect the assessment from the patient or in the event the patient’s assessment is less than the full cost of care for
such patient, all other persons liable for the cost of care for such patient shall pay to the department their respective assessments as provided by Code Section 37-9-5.

History.
Ga. L. 1960, p. 1138, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1966, p. 143, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37.

Law reviews.

For comment advocating legislative determination of parental liability for costs of institutional custody of child involuntarily committed to a mental health facility in response to criminal behavior in light of Treglown v. Department of Health &
Social Servs., 38 Wis. 2d 317, 156 N.W.2d 363 (1968), see 19 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (1968).

37-9-5.
Assessment of persons liable for cost of care generally.

The department shall determine all persons who are liable for the cost of care of a patient and notify such persons of their joint and several liability and of their assessment. Such notice shall offer opportunity for any person so notified to be heard
to show cause, if there be any, why such person should not be liable for payment of the assessment.

When the department determines that persons legally liable for the cost of care of a patient do not have sufficient income or assets to pay the entire cost of care, the department shall determine for each such person the amount payable toward cost of
care which shall be a fair and equitable amount based on ability to pay determined in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 37-9-6. When applicable, the notice provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall
reflect as the assessment the amount payable toward cost of care provided for in this chapter; and if a hearing is requested by any person receiving such notice, such person may question his liability for cost of care as well as
the amount of his assessment. Failure of the patient or other persons liable for cost of care to provide financial information to the department required to determine assessments on the basis of ability to pay in accordance with
the requirements of Code Section 37-9-6 or failure of the patient or other persons liable for cost of care to cooperate with the department in obtaining payment of any insurance or health benefits available for a patient may result
in assessment of such persons of the full cost of care of the patient. Failure of the patient or other persons liable for cost of care to cooperate with the department in applying on behalf of the patient for federal benefits
and insurance, program, or plan benefits in order that a determination may be made of eligibility for such benefits may also result in assessment of such persons of the full cost of care of the patient and the burden of providing
information to reduce the full cost of care is on the patient or other persons liable for cost of care.

Any investigation or hearing regarding ability to pay shall not operate to deny or delay admission of a patient to a hospital or to deny or delay providing services for such patient.

It shall be the duty of the department to reexamine the assessment periodically and either reduce or increase such assessment as hereinafter provided in accordance with changes in the ability to pay of the person liable for cost of care. If the department
determines that the economic circumstances of a person liable for cost of care have improved to an extent justifying an increase in the assessment, any such increase shall apply only to cost of care for services rendered for the
patient after the effective date of the increase in assessment and no such increase shall cause the assessment to exceed the total cost of care. The department may not increase an assessment as provided in this Code section without
affording the person liable for cost of care an opportunity for a hearing on the question of the increase in the assessment. A person liable for cost of care may apply to the department for a change in the assessment when the person’s
economic circumstances have changed sufficiently to affect adversely his future ability to pay. If an assessment for services previously rendered for a patient is being paid in accordance with a scheduled plan of payments approved
by the department, then a reduction in assessment because of a change in the economic circumstances affecting adversely the ability to pay of the person liable for cost of care may apply to that portion of the assessment for services
previously rendered for the patient which remain unpaid as of the date of the reduction of the assessment as well as to the assessment for cost of services rendered after the date of the reduction. However, no such reduction shall
require the refund of any payments made on an assessment prior to the date of the reduction of the assessment. After investigation and hearing, the department shall act upon the application made by the person liable for cost of
care. Any redetermination of the assessment pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the requirements of Code Section 37-9-6. Notwithstanding any reexamination or corresponding adjustment of an assessment which might be
afforded, each assessment shall be valid for a period of 12 months from the date of the initial assessment or any reassessment thereafter. No reduction, increase, or opportunity for hearing shall be allowed after the assessment
period.

The department may accept payment for full cost of care if any person liable for cost of care offers such payment in lieu of declaring financial circumstances and having an assessment determined by hearing. Any assessment made pursuant to the authority
of this subsection shall be subject to redetermination as provided by subsection (d) of this Code section if requested by the person liable for cost of care.

The department shall adopt and comply with procedures to inform adequately patients and other persons determined liable for the cost of care of their right to hearings and of their right to request reassessments.

History.
Ga. L. 1960, p. 1138, §§ 6, 9, 10; Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 987, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 37; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1445, § 2.

37-9-6.
Standards for determination of assessments for less than full cost of care.

The board shall establish standards for determining assessments when such assessments are less than the full cost of care. Such standards shall be based on the income, assets, and other circumstances of the persons liable for cost of care and shall include
consideration of the number of dependents, as defined under Georgia income tax law and regulations; legal rights to payment under any insurance agreement, and other evidence of ability to pay; but no assessment shall be fixed or collected
on the basis of any assets exempted by subsection (b) of Code Section 37-9-8. In determining assessments for persons liable for cost of care, the department shall develop procedures to ensure that no dependent, deduction, or personal
exemption as defined by Georgia income tax law will be reflected more than once in the determination of assessments for any one patient. In establishing standards to determine such assessments, the board shall adopt criteria to be
applied uniformly to all persons liable for cost of care, except that the board may adopt separate criteria for assessing monthly benefits or funds from any source to cover cost of care, support, and treatment provided to patients
who are hospitalized for longer than three months and whose current needs, as defined by the Social Security Administration, are being met. However, the board shall ensure that the assessment made each month shall allow the recipients
of such benefits or funds to retain at a minimum an amount as a personal allowance equal to the amount of the personal needs allowance allowed beneficiaries under the state medical assistance plan. Further, such standards will include
special provisions for assessing developmental disabilities respite care allowed by law or duly adopted departmental regulations, where such admissions are legally limited to 56 days of care a year. To the extent practicable, such
criteria shall ensure that persons having the same or substantially the same financial ability to pay cost of care shall have the same or substantially the same financial obligation to pay such cost of care.

History.
Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 968, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1445, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 11/HB 324.

37-9-7.
Inquiry into and determination of income and assets; declarations by persons liable for cost of care; access to income tax records; confidentiality; attestation of indigent financial status.

The department, through its duly authorized agents, shall have the authority to investigate or otherwise determine the income and assets of the patient or his estate and when necessary the income and assets of all other persons liable for the cost of
care of such patient in order to determine ability to pay cost of care. All persons liable for cost of care must provide signed consent forms necessary to authorize and conduct an investigation to determine the income and assets
of such persons in order to determine ability to pay cost of care. The department shall further have the authority to contract with any person, firm, or corporation which it finds necessary to provide the information appropriate
to the carrying out of its duties under this chapter.

The department shall require declarations to be filed by the patient or other persons liable for cost of care necessary to determine the assessments required by this chapter and shall prescribe the form and content thereof. All such declarations are to
be regarded as essential to carrying out the public policy of this state; and any person who knowingly falsifies such declarations shall be charged as for false swearing. Failure by the patient or other persons liable for cost
of care to (1) provide information required by such declarations or (2) provide signature of consent for the department to conduct an investigation authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section shall create a rebuttable presumption
that the patient or other persons liable for cost of care consent to and agree with the assessment of the full cost of care, and the declaration shall contain on its face, conspicuously and in clear language, a statement to that
effect.

The department, through its duly authorized agents, shall have access to Georgia income tax records for the purpose of obtaining necessary information to enforce this chapter. Upon the request of the department or its duly authorized agents, the state
revenue commissioner and his agents or employees shall disclose such income tax information contained in any report or return required under Georgia law as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter. Any tax information
secured from the federal government by the Department of Revenue pursuant to express provisions of Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code may not be disclosed by the Department of Revenue pursuant to this subsection. Any person
receiving any tax information or tax returns under the authority of this subsection shall be considered either an officer or employee as those terms are used in subsection (a) of Code Section 48-7-60; and as such an officer or
employee, any person receiving any tax information or returns under the authority of this subsection shall be subject to Code Section 48-7-61.

Any evidence, records, or other information obtained by the department or its duly authorized agents pursuant to the authority of this Code section shall be confidential and shall be used by the department or its agents only for the purposes of enforcing
this chapter and shall not be released for any purpose other than a hearing provided for by this chapter.

The department shall develop procedures to ensure that persons with no other documentation or evidence may sign an affidavit attesting to their indigent financial status.

History.
Ga. L. 1960, p. 1138, § 3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 9; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1445, § 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this Act is applicable to taxable years ending on or after March 11, 1987, and that a taxpayer with a taxable year ending on or after January 1, 1987, and before March 11,
1987, may elect to have the provisions of that Act apply.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by that Act.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that provisions of the federal Tax Reform Act of 1986 and of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 which as of January 1, 1987, were not yet effective become effective for purposes
of Georgia taxation on the same dates as they become effective for federal purposes.

U.S. Code.

Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (c), is codified as

26 U.S.C. § 6103
.

Law reviews.

For comment advocating legislative determination of parental liability for costs of institutional custody of child involuntarily committed to a mental health facility in response to criminal behavior in light of Treglown v. Department of Health &
Social Servs., 38 Wis. 2d 317, 156 N.W.2d 363 (1968), see 19 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (1968).

37-9-8.
Use of assets other than income for determination of assessments; assets exempt from determination; levy of assessment.

In addition to the use of income for determining assessments provided for in this chapter and for the payment thereof, any other assets of a person liable for cost of care, except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, shall be considered
in determining an assessment and shall be liable to be assessed for the payment thereof. Such assets shall include any tangible or intangible property or any combination thereof and shall also include the net proceeds derived from
the disposition of any such property including any disposition of any such property which took place 90 days or less prior to the date services were first rendered to the patient by a hospital. When the income of a person liable
for cost of care is sufficient to determine that an assessment should be made for the total cost of care, it shall not be necessary for the department to investigate and determine the other assets of such person; but such investigation
and determination may be made by the department if necessary to collect the assessment from the person liable for cost of care.

The following assets of a person liable for cost of care shall be exempt from subsection (a) of this Code section:

Real property which qualifies for a homestead exemption from ad valorem taxation; and

Any other real property which constitutes the principal residence of the person liable for cost of care but which does not qualify for a homestead exemption under paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code section, as of January 1, 1993, following six months of continuous inpatient hospitalization, the department is expressly authorized to levy an assessment for the full cost of care against the assets of
all patients having assets accumulated from government benefit payments in excess of amounts allowed by the eligibility resource limit for institutionalized residents established by Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act
of 1935, as amended, and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, until said assets are reduced to a level which would establish resource eligibility under such program for the patient; provided, however, that the assets listed
in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be exempt from such assessment if said assets would also be an excluded resource under eligibility criteria of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. Following April 13, 1992,
the department shall provide notice regarding the provisions of this subsection to patients and family members or other appropriate persons who may be affected by the provisions of this subsection.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to supersede the provisions of Chapter 12 of Title 53, “The Revised Georgia Trust Code of 2010.”

History.
Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 58; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1445, § 5; Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 16/SB 131.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “April 13, 1992” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” in the last sentence of subsection (c).

37-9-9.
Exhaustion of benefits under other programs or plans required prior to expenditure of public funds; determination of assessments; assignment of benefits; subrogation.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the department shall not be required to expend public funds for the purpose of providing support, care, and treatment covered under this chapter to any patient until such patient has exhausted his or her eligibility
and receipt of benefits under all other existing or future private, public, local, state, or federal programs or plans. Before the department expends public funds for a patient’s cost of care, the department may assess and recover
the cost of a patient’s care from the patient or other persons liable for such patient’s cost of care if such patient is eligible for benefits under any other program or plan. In the event the patient is covered by an insurance contract
or any other plan or benefit of any nature providing for payment of hospitalization, medical expenses, and other health care services or any combination thereof, such patient or other person liable for the cost of care of such patient
shall pay or cause to have paid from such insurance, plan, or benefit without deduction, exemptions, or credits, the full cost of care of the patient, or that portion thereof covered by such insurance, plan, or benefit. The assessment
for cost of care of the patient made by the department pursuant to Code Section 37-9-5 shall be for the total amount payable by such insurance, plan, or benefit up to the total cost of care or for that portion of cost of care payable
by such insurance, plan, or benefit; and if the proceeds from such insurance, plan, or benefit are less than the total cost of care, such assessment shall include an assessment based on the remaining balance, except where full payment
of the balance or a portion thereof is required by a health insurance program or other plan or benefit, in which case the balance or at least the required portion thereof will be the assessment. Further, the department shall comply
with all federally funded health and medical insurance programs which require established amounts payable by beneficiaries and is authorized to accept amounts payable toward cost of care under any insurance program, plan, or benefit
if paid according to the provisions of such programs, plans, or benefits even though the amounts payable may exceed cost of care amounts as provided by this chapter. The department shall develop procedures to apply the provisions of
this chapter, specifically Code Section 37-9-5, to any amounts which remain payable by the patient or beneficiaries under a federally funded health and medical insurance program, provided that the application of any such procedures
does not invalidate payment of benefits under the program. For the purpose of carrying out this Code section, the department is authorized to accept assignment of benefits payable under such insurance, plans, or benefits; but the department
shall not require the assignment of such benefits as a condition precedent to the admission of a patient to a hospital or as a condition precedent to providing services for such patient. In order to collect maximum benefits payable
toward cost of care, the department is authorized to contract with any insurance program, plan, or benefit to become a participating member hospital if payments are not made or are made at a lesser than full coverage amount to nonparticipating
members. Moreover, the department or its designated agents will have subrogation rights to the recovery of a patient’s cost of care that the patient or other person liable for the patient’s cost of care may have against any person,
estate, organization, entity, or plan. Further, if any patient or other person liable for the cost of a patient’s care receives benefits or funds in settlement, judgment, or otherwise for any health care, medical expenses, or hospitalization
or other care directly related to services and care provided by the department to a patient, the patient or other person liable for cost of care will pay or cause to have paid the full cost of care or that portion thereof recovered
which is directly related to the care provided by the department. This right of subrogation is cumulative and in addition to any other remedy and this right shall be available for any enforcement or collection process which is contemplated
under other provisions of this chapter.

History.
Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 6; Ga. L. 1984, p. 968, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1445, § 6.

Law reviews.

For comment advocating legislative determination of parental liability for costs of institutional custody of child involuntarily committed to a mental health facility in response to criminal behavior in light of Treglown v. Department of Health &
Social Servs., 38 Wis. 2d 317, 156 N.W.2d 363 (1968), see 19 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (1968).

37-9-10.
Hearings.

Hearings shall be held in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and judicial review of a final decision by the department shall be as provided in Code Section 50-13-19.

History.
Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 9.

37-9-11.
Billing by department; authority to maintain action for collection.

The department shall bill persons liable for cost of care for the amount due on their assessments in the same manner as other debts and accounts. No bill shall be payable unless it contains the dates of service for which the costs billed therein were
incurred. The department is authorized to maintain in the name of the department and the State of Georgia any action at law or equity in any court of this state or any other state which may be necessary to collect such sums.

History.
Ga. L. 1960, p. 1138, § 10; Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 10; Ga. L. 1996, p. 949, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 949, § 2, effective April 15, 1996, provides that the 1996 amendment becomes effective only when funds are specifically appropriated for purposes of that Act in an Appropriations Act making specific reference to that Act. Funds were not
appropriated at the 1996, 1997, or 1998 session of the General Assembly. Funds were appropriated at the 1999 session of the General Assembly.

Law reviews.

For comment advocating legislative determination of parental liability for costs of institutional custody of child involuntarily committed to a mental health facility in response to criminal behavior in light of Treglown v. Department of Health &
Social Servs., 38 Wis. 2d 317, 156 N.W.2d 363 (1968), see 19 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (1968).

37-9-12.
[Reserved] Deposit of funds collected.

History.
Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 13; repealed by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1445, § 7, effective April 13, 1992.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1445, § 7 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 13, 1992.

37-9-13.
Promulgation of rules and regulations by board.

The board shall have the authority to promulgate necessary rules and regulations to implement and carry out this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall be adopted and promulgated pursuant to the requirements of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia
Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.
Ga. L. 1979, p. 834, § 12.